Massachusetts, session 194th, S1009.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following subsection in Section 16G:-
(o.)The secretary of housing and economic development shall, in consultation with the
Rural Policy Advisory Commission, establish a rural development initiative to be administered
by the executive office through a contract with the Massachusetts Development Finance Agency
established by section 2 of chapter 23G. The initiative will provide technical assistance to
identify and implement strategies that will spur direct investment in rural communities to create
jobs and expand businesses, identify cross-sector partnerships, accelerate the engagement of
community members in actionable planning, and implement local economic development
initiatives.
of 1